Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1740
Foreign support order; obligor; new or additional income or employment; county or authorized attorney; duties.

If the county attorney or authorized attorney determines that an obligor subject to a foreign support order has obtained employment in another state or has a new or additional source of income in another state, he or she shall notify the agency or person who requested the income withholding of the changes and shall forward to such agency or person all information he or she has or can obtain with respect to the obligor's new address and the name and address of the obligor's new employer or other payor or other source of income. The county attorney or authorized attorney shall include with the notice a certified copy of the income withholding order or notice in effect in this state.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 60;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 42.